it: Fattore di forma dell'otturatore remoto: Otturatore a cavo; Maniglia di presa; Portachiavi/pulsante; Supporto per collo; Morsetto per telefono con otturatore; Controller ad anello; Selfie stick con otturatore; Maniglia laterale; Modulo autonomo; Adattatore per montaggio su treppiede; Altro
sv: Fjärrslutarens formfaktor: Kabelslutare; Grepphandtag; Nyckelbricka/knapp; Halshållarfäste; Telefonklämma med slutare; Ringkontroll; Selfiepinne med slutare; Sidohandtag; Fristående modul; Stativfästeadapter; Övrigt
es: Factor de forma del obturador remoto: Obturador de cable; Mango de agarre; Llavero/botón; Soporte para el cuello; Abrazadera para teléfono con obturador; Controlador de anillo; Palo selfie con obturador; Asa lateral; Módulo independiente; Adaptador de montaje para trípode; Otros
pl: Współczynnik kształtu zdalnego spustu migawki: Kabel zdalnego sterowania migawką; Uchwyt; Pilot/przycisk; Uchwyt na szyję; Uchwyt na telefon z migawką; Sterownik pierścienia; Kijek do selfie z migawką; Uchwyt boczny; Moduł autonomiczny; Adapter do montażu na statywie; Inne
de: Formfaktor des Fernauslösers: Kabelauslöser; Griff; Schlüsselanhänger/Taste; Nackenhalterhalterung; Telefonklemme mit Auslöser; Ring-Controller; Selfie-Stick mit Auslöser; Seitengriff; Standalone-Modul; Stativadapter; Sonstiges
tr: Uzaktan deklanşör form faktörü: Kablolu deklanşör; Tutma sapı; Anahtarlık/düğme; Boyun tutucu montajı; Deklanşörlü telefon tutucu; Halka kontrolörü; Deklanşörlü selfie çubuğu; Yan sap; Bağımsız modül; Tripod montaj adaptörü; Diğer
ru: Форм-фактор дистанционного спуска затвора: Проводное устройство спуска затвора; Ручка-держатель; Брелок или кнопка; Крепление на шею; Зажим для телефона с функцией спуска затвора; Кольцо-контроллер; Монопод для селфи с функцией спуска затвора; Боковая ручка; Отдельный модуль; Адаптер для штатива; Другой
en: Remote shutter form factor: Cable shutter; Grip handle; Keyfob/button; Neck holder mount; Phone clamp with shutter; Ring controller; Selfie stick with shutter; Side handle; Standalone module; Tripod mount adapter; Other
da: Formfaktor for fjernudløser: Kabellukker; Gribehåndtag; Nøglefob/knap; Halsholderbeslag; Telefonklemme med lukker; Ringcontroller; Selfiestang med lukker; Sidehåndtag; Selvstændigt modul; Stativmonteringsadapter; Andet
hu: Távoli zár formátuma: Kábeles zárkioldás; Markolatos távkioldó; Keyfob/button; Nyakpántos tartó; Telefontartó zárkioldóval; Gyűrűvezérlő; Szelfibot zárkioldóval; Oldalsó fogantyú; Önálló modul; Állványcsatlakozó adapter; Egyéb
lt-LT: Nuotolinio užrakto forma: Kabelio sklendė; Rankena; Pultelis / mygtukas; Kaklo laikiklio tvirtinimas; Telefono laikiklis su užraktu; Žiedo valdiklis; Asmenukių lazda su užraktu; Šoninė rankena; Atskiras modulis; Trikojo tvirtinimo adapteris; Kita
ko: 원격 셔터 폼 팩터: 케이블 셔터; 그립 핸들; 키패드/버튼; 넥 홀더 마운트; 셔터가 있는 휴대폰 클램프; 링 컨트롤러; 셔터가 있는 셀카봉; 사이드 핸들; 독립형 모듈; 삼각대 마운트 어댑터; 기타
fr: Facteur de forme du déclencheur à distance: Obturateur à câble; Poignée de préhension; Porte-clés/bouton; Support de cou; Pince pour téléphone avec obturateur; Contrôleur d'anneau; Perche à selfie avec obturateur; Poignée d'attache; Module autonome; Adaptateur de montage pour trépied; Autre
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan sulkimen malli: Kaapelikaukolaukaisin; Kahva; Avaimenperä/painike; Kaulakiinnike; Puhelinpidike laukaisimella; Rengasohjain; Selfietikku laukaisimella; Sivukahva; Erillinen moduuli; Jalustakiinnityssovitin; Muu
nb: Formfaktor for fjernutløser: Kabellukker; Gripehåndtak; Nøkkelbrikke/knapp; Feste for nakkeholder; Telefonklemme med lukker; Ringkontroller; Selfiestang med lukker; Sidehåndtak; Frittstående modul; Stativmonteringsadapter; Annet
nl: Vormfactor van afstandsbediening voor sluiter: Kabelsluiter; Handgreep; Druppel/knop; Nekhouderbevestiging; Telefoonklem met sluiter; DJ-controller; Selfiestick met sluiter; Zijhandgreep; Zelfstandige module; Statiefbevestigingsadapter; Andere
sl-SI: Oblika daljinskega sprožilca.: Žični sprožilec; Ročaj za oprijem; Keyfob/button; Nosilec za vrat; Objemka za telefon s sprožilcem; Obročni upravljalnik; Selfie palica s sprožilcem; Stranski ročaj; Samostojni modul; Adapter za pritrditev na stativ; Drugo
el: Συντελεστής μορφής τηλεχειριστηρίου κλείστρου: Κλείστρο καλωδίου; Λαβή; Ασύρματη συσκευή κλειδώματος/κουμπί; Βάση στήριξης λαιμού; Ανάπτορας τηλεφώνου με κλείστρο; Χειριστήριο δακτυλίου; Μπαστούνι κάμερας με κλείστρο; Πλαϊνή λαβή; Αυτόνομο στοιχείο; Προσαρμογέας βάσης τριπόδου; Άλλο
cs: Tvar dálkové spouště: Kabelová spoušť; Rukojeť; Klíčenka/tlačítko; Držák na krk; Držák se spouští; Prstenový ovladač; Selfie tyč se spouští; Boční rukojeť; Samostatný modul; Adaptér pro uchycení stativu; Jiné
vi: Kiểu dáng nút chụp từ xa: Nút bấm có dây cáp; Tay cầm; Móc khóa/nút bấm điều khiển; Giá đỡ đeo cổ; Kẹp điện thoại có nút chụp; Bộ điều khiển dạng nhẫn; Gậy tự sướng có nút chụp; Tay cầm phụ; Mô-đun độc lập; Bộ chuyển đổi giá ba chân; Khác
zh-TW: 遙控快門外型設計: 有線快門線; 握手把; 鑰匙圈遙控器/按鈕; 頸部固定座; 附快門的手機夾; 環形控制器; 附快門的自拍棒; 側邊把手; 獨立式模組; 三腳架底座轉接器; 其他
th: รูปแบบชัตเตอร์ระยะไกล: ชัตเตอร์เคเบิล; ด้ามจับ; พวงกุญแจ/ปุ่ม; ที่ยึดคอ; ที่หนีบโทรศัพท์แบบมีชัตเตอร์; ตัวควบคุมวงแหวน; ไม้เซลฟี่พร้อมชัตเตอร์; ด้ามจับด้านข้าง; โมดูลแบบสแตนด์อโลน; อะแดปเตอร์ขาตั้งกล้อง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Formato do obturador remoto: Obturador de cabo; Alça de manuseio; Chave/botão com sensor magnético; Montagem de suporte de pescoço; Grampo de telefone com obturador; Controlador de toque; Bastão de selfie com obturador; Alça lateral; Módulo autônomo; Adaptador de montagem em tripé; Outro
pt-PT: Fator de forma do obturador remoto: Obturador de cabo; Pega ergonómica; Chave/botão; Suporte de pescoço; Braçadeira para telefone com obturador; Controlador de anel; Bastão de selfie com obturador; Pega lateral; Módulo autónomo; Adaptador para montagem em tripé; Outro
ja: リモートシャッターフォームファクター: ケーブルシャッター; グリップハンドル; キーフォブ/ボタン; ネックホルダーマウント; シャッター付き電話クランプ; リングコントローラー; シャッター付き自撮り棒; サイドハンドル; スタンドアロンモジュール; 三脚マウントアダプター; その他
ro-RO: Factor de formă al telecomenzii pentru obturator: Obturator cu cablu; Mâner de prindere; Telecomandă breloc/buton; Montură suport pentru gât; Clemă telefonică cu obturator; Controler inel; Băț pentru selfie cu obturator; Mâner lateral; Modul independent; Adaptor pentru montare pe trepied; Altele
zh-CN: 遥控快门外形: 有线快门; 握持手柄; 钥匙扣/按键式; 颈挂支架; 带快门的手机夹; 指环控制器; 带快门的自拍杆; 侧手柄; 独立模块; 三脚架转接器; 其他
bg-BG: Типоразмер на дистанционния затвор: Кабелен затвор; Дръжка за захващане; Ключодържател/бутон; Държач за врата; Скоба за телефон със затвор; Пръстеновиден контролер; Селфи стик със затвор; Странична дръжка; Самостоятелен модул; Адаптер за монтиране на статив; Други
sk-SK: Formát diaľkovej spúšte: Káblový spúšťač; Rukoväť s úchopom; Diaľkové ovládanie; Držiak na krk; Držiak telefónu so spúšťou; Ovládač v tvare prsteňa; Selfie palica so spúšťou; Bočná rukoväť; Samostatný modul; Adaptér na montáž na statív; Iné
hr-HR: Faktor oblika daljinskog okidača: Kabelski okidač; Ručka; Privjesak/gumb; Držač za vrat; Stezaljka za telefon s okidačem; Kontroler prstena; Štap za selfije s okidačem; Bočna ručka; Samostalni modul; Adapter za montažu stativa; Ostalo